Washington statutes.
RCW 32.50.040

Costs of supervisory direction and conservatorship.

All costs incident to supervisory direction and the conservatorship shall be fixed and determined by the director and shall be a charge against the assets of the savings bank to be allowed and paid as the director may determine.

[ 2010 c 88 s 69.]